Louisiana, session 2026, HB53.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:1352(A)(89) through (95) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1352. Definitions
A. As used in this Chapter, "racketeering activity" means committing,
attempting to commit, conspiring to commit, or soliciting, coercing, or intimidating
another person to commit any crime that is punishable under the following
provisions of Title 14 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, the Uniform
Controlled Dangerous Substances Law, or the Louisiana Securities Law:
* * *
(89) R.S. 14:90 (Gambling)
(90) R.S. 14:90.2 (Gambling in public)
(91) R.S. 14:90.3 (Gambling by computer)
(92) R.S. 14:90.6 (Gambling or wagering at cockfights)
(93) R.S. 14:90.7 (Gambling by electronic sweepstakes device)
(94) R.S. 14:90.8 (Unlawful wagering; prohibited player)
(95) R.S. 14:118.1 (Bribery of sports participants)
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 53 ENROLLED
Section 2. The Louisiana Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
renumber the new entries to ensure that the crimes are listed in alphabetical order.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.